Tennessee, session 114, SB0509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 12-3-1205(b)(4)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(B) Purchases of construction, engineering, or architectural services, or
construction materials. As used in this subdivision (b)(4)(B), "construction" and
"construction materials" does not include:
(i) Materials used in the operation of a municipal utility system, including,
but not limited to, transformers, conductors, insulators, poles, cross-arms,
anchors, pipes, valves, meters, or other components or parts of a utility system,
whether purchased in accordance with a purchasing agreement with the
Tennessee Valley authority or another purchasing arrangement; or
(ii) Materials, labor, and services used for maintenance, operations,
component replacement, or repairs of existing facilities and grounds owned or
operated by a local education agency or by a local government agency; or
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0509
001185
- 1 -